Wyoming, session 2025, SF0163.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-18-101(a)(v)(A), (B) and by
creating a new paragraph (xii), 39-18-103(b), 39-18-106(a),
39-18-107(a)(i) and (c)(i)(intro) and 39-18-108(c)(ii)(A),
(vi) and (e) are amended to read:

39-18-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:
SF0163

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0739

(v) "Wholesaler" means any person who:

(A) Whether located within or without
Wyoming Regardless of physical location, imports, sells or
distributes nicotine products cigarettes into this state
for sale or resale;

(B) Purchases nicotine products cigarettes
in this state for sale or resale;

(xii) "Cigarette" means:

(A) Any roll of tobacco wrapped in paper or
in any substance not containing tobacco; and

(B) Any roll of tobacco wrapped in any
substance containing tobacco which, because of its
appearance, the type of tobacco used in the filler, or its
packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or
purchased by, consumers as a cigarette described in
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.

SF0163

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0739
39-18-103. Imposition.

(b) Basis of tax. The state preempts the field of
imposing taxes on nicotine products cigarettes and no city,
town or county shall impose, levy or collect taxes upon the
sale, occupation or privilege of selling nicotine products
cigarettes. This subsection shall not be construed to
prevent a city, town or county from regulating the public
use of nicotine products.

39-18-106. Licensing; permits.

(a) Every wholesaler, cigarette importer and
cigarette manufacturer who sells or offers to sell nicotine
products cigarettes in this state must have a license to do
so issued by the department. No license or renewal of a
license shall be granted under this section unless the
wholesaler states in writing, under penalty for false
swearing, that he shall comply fully with W.S. 9-4-1201
through 9-4-1209. The license fee is ten dollars ($10.00)
per year or fraction thereof and is valid through June 30
in each year. The license will be granted only to
wholesalers who own or operate the place from which sales
SF0163

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0739
are made and additional licenses must be obtained for each
separate location. The licenses are transferable pursuant
to rules and regulations promulgated by the department.

39-18-107. Compliance; collection procedures.

(a) Returns and reports. The following shall apply:

(i) Each wholesaler shall keep complete and
accurate records of all nicotine products cigarettes
purchased and sold for three (3) years. The records shall
be in the form prescribed by the department and will be
available for inspection by the department at any
reasonable time. The department may investigate and examine
the stock of cigarettes upon any premises where they are
stored or sold;

(c) Timelines. The following shall apply:

(i) No later than the twentieth day of the month
following the sale of cigarettes, or the month following
the end of the calendar quarter for nicotine products other
than cigarettes, each wholesaler shall return to the
SF0163

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0739
department the following information on forms furnished by
the department:

39-18-108. Enforcement.

(c) Penalties. The following shall apply:

(ii) The following acts are misdemeanors
punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars
($100.00) or imprisonment in the county jail for not more
than six (6) months or both:

(A) Selling or distributing nicotine
products cigarettes as a wholesaler without a license;

(vi) Any person who purchases any nicotine
product cigarettes for resale in this state from other than
a licensed wholesaler is liable for the tax and any
penalties and interest imposed under this paragraph as if
he were a wholesaler under this act and shall pay an
additional penalty of twenty-five percent (25%) of any tax
due. Any wholesaler or other person who fails to file any
return or to pay any tax within the time required or
SF0163

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0739
permitted by this subsection shall be subject to a penalty
of five percent (5%) of the amount of the tax due, plus one
percent (1%) of the tax for each month of delinquency or
fraction thereof. The department may waive all or any part
of this penalty for good cause shown;

(e) Tax sales. Cigarettes seized in accordance with
paragraph (c)(i) of this section shall may be sold by the
department to a licensed wholesaler to the best advantage
of the state. Proceeds from the sale shall be remitted to
the state treasurer for deposit into the general fund. The
licensed wholesaler purchasing the cigarettes shall pay
taxes and affix stamps, imprints or impressions as provided
by this article on cigarettes so purchased.

Section 2. W.S. 39-18-101(a)(iv) and (viii) through
(x), 39-18-102(b), 39-18-103(a)(iii) through (vi) and
(c)(iii) through (vi), 39-18-104(c) through (h),
39-18-107(a)(ii) and (c)(i)(D) and 39-18-111(b) are
repealed.

SF0163

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0739
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0163